Utah statutes.
16-16-819.   Conflict of interest.

(1)  The law applicable to conflicts of interest between a director of an entity organized under Title 3, Uniform Agricultural Cooperative Association Act, governs conflicts of interest between a limited cooperative association and a director or member of a committee of the board of directors.

(2)  A director does not have a conflict of interest under this chapter or the organic rules solely because the director's conduct relating to the duties of the director may further the director's own interest.

